Idaho, session 2025, S1008.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 18-3309, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 2. That Chapter 33, Title 18, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 18-3309, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
18-3309. CONCEALED WEAPONS AT PUBLIC COLLEGES AND UNIVERSITIES. The
board of regents of the university of Idaho, the board of trustees of the
state colleges and universities, the board for career technical education,
and the boards of trustees of each of the community colleges established un-
der chapter 21, title 33, Idaho Code, shall not regulate or prohibit the oth-
erwise lawful possession, carrying, or transporting of firearms or ammuni-
tion by any person carrying a concealed weapon pursuant to section 18-3302,
18-3302H, or 18-3302K, Idaho Code.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.